Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF384.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MINNEAPOLIS PUBLIC HOUSING AUTHORITY.new text end new text begin $35,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency for a grant to the Minneapolis Public Housing Authority for the city of Minneapolis and its affiliated entities, including but not limited to its wholly controlled nonprofit corporation, Community Housing Resources, to rehabilitate, preserve, equip, and repair its deeply affordable family housing units. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end